Illinois, session 104th, HB4837.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Civil Procedure is amended by 5changing Section 15-1501 as follows: 6    (735 ILCS 5/15-1501)  (from Ch. 110, par. 15-1501)7    Sec. 15-1501. Parties. 8    (a) Necessary Parties. For the purposes of Section 2-405 9of the Code of Civil Procedure, only (i) the mortgagor and (ii) 10other persons (but not guarantors) who owe payment of 11indebtedness or the performance of other obligations secured 12by the mortgage and against whom personal liability is 13asserted shall be necessary parties defendant in a 14foreclosure. The court may proceed to adjudicate their 15respective interests, but any disposition of the mortgaged 16real estate shall be subject to (i) the interests of all other 17persons not made a party or (ii) interests in the mortgaged 18real estate not otherwise barred or terminated in the 19foreclosure.20    (b) Permissible Parties. Any party may join as a party any 21other person, although such person is not a necessary party, 22including, without limitation, the following:23        (1) All persons having a possessory interest in the   HB4837- 2 -LRB104 19695 JRC 33144 b1    mortgaged real estate;2        (2) A mortgagor's spouse who has waived the right of 3    homestead;4        (3) A trustee holding an interest in the mortgaged 5    real estate or a beneficiary of such trust;6        (4) The owner or holder of a note secured by a trust 7    deed;8        (5) Guarantors, provided that in a foreclosure any 9    such guarantor also may be joined as a party in a separate 10    count in an action on such guarantor's guaranty;11        (6) The State of Illinois or any political subdivision 12    thereof, where a foreclosure involves real estate upon 13    which the State or such subdivision has an interest or 14    claim for lien, in which case "An Act in relation to 15    immunity for the State of Illinois", approved December 10, 16    1971, as amended, shall not be effective;17        (7) The United States of America or any agency or 18    department thereof where a foreclosure involves real 19    estate upon which the United States of America or such 20    agency or department has an interest or a claim for lien;21        (8) Any assignee of leases or rents relating to the 22    mortgaged real estate;23        (9) Any person who may have a lien under the 24    Mechanic's Lien Act; and25        (10) Any other mortgagee or claimant.26    (c) Unknown Owners. Any unknown owner may be made a party   HB4837- 3 -LRB104 19695 JRC 33144 b1in accordance with Section 2-413 of the Code of Civil 2Procedure.3    (d) Right to Become Party. Any person who has or claims an 4interest in real estate which is the subject of a foreclosure 5or an interest in any debt secured by the mortgage shall have 6an unconditional right to appear and become a party in such 7foreclosure in accordance with subsection (e) of Section 815-1501, provided, that neither such appearance by a lessee 9whose interest in the real estate is subordinate to the 10interest being foreclosed, nor the act of making such lessee a 11party, shall result in the termination of the lessee's lease 12unless the termination of the lease or lessee's interest in 13the mortgaged real estate is specifically ordered by the court 14in the judgment of foreclosure.15    (e) Time of Intervention.16        (1) Of Right. A person not a party, other than a 17    nonrecord claimant given notice in accordance with 18    paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of Section 15-1502, who 19    has or claims an interest in the mortgaged real estate may 20    appear and become a party at any time prior to the entry of 21    judgment of foreclosure. A nonrecord claimant given such 22    notice may appear and become a party at any time prior to 23    the earlier of (i) the entry of a judgment of foreclosure 24    or (ii) 30 days after such notice is given.25        (2) In Court's Discretion. After the right to 26    intervene expires and prior to the sale in accordance with   HB4837- 4 -LRB104 19695 JRC 33144 b1    the judgment, the court may permit a person who has or 2    claims an interest in the mortgaged real estate to appear 3    and become a party on such terms as the court may deem 4    just.5        (3) Later Right. After the sale of the mortgaged real 6    estate in accordance with a judgment of foreclosure and 7    prior to the entry of an order confirming the sale, a 8    person who has or claims an interest in the mortgaged real 9    estate, may appear and become a party, on such terms as the 10    court may deem just, for the sole purpose of claiming an 11    interest in the proceeds of sale. Any such party shall be 12    deemed a party from the commencement of the foreclosure, 13    and the interest of such party in the real estate shall be 14    subject to all orders and judgments entered in the 15    foreclosure.16        (4) Termination of Interest. Except as provided in 17    Section 15-1501(d), the interest of any person who is 18    allowed to appear and become a party shall be terminated, 19    and the interest of such party in the real estate shall 20    attach to the proceeds of sale.21    (f) Separate Actions. Any mortgagee or claimant, other 22than the mortgagee who commences a foreclosure, whose interest 23in the mortgaged real estate is recorded prior to the filing of 24a notice of foreclosure in accordance with this Article but 25who is not made a party to such foreclosure, shall not be 26barred from filing a separate foreclosure (i) as an   HB4837- 5 -LRB104 19695 JRC 33144 b1intervening defendant or counterclaimant in accordance with 2subsections (d) and (e) of Section 15-1501 if a judgment of 3foreclosure has not been entered in the original foreclosure 4or (ii) in a new foreclosure subsequent to the entry of a 5judgment of foreclosure in the original foreclosure.6    (g) Service on the State of Illinois. When making the 7State of Illinois a party to a foreclosure, summons may be 8served by sending, by registered or certified mail, a copy of 9the summons and the complaint to the Attorney General. The 10complaint shall set forth with particularity the nature of the 11interest or lien of the State of Illinois. If such interest or 12lien appears in a recorded instrument, the complaint must 13state the document number of the instrument and the office 14wherein it was recorded.15    (h) Special Representatives. With respect to the property 16that is the subject of the action, the court shall is not 17required to appoint a special representative for a deceased 18mortgagor for the purpose of defending the action. , if there 19is a:20        (1) living person, persons, or entity that holds a 21    100% interest in the property, by virtue of being the 22    deceased mortgagor's surviving joint tenant or surviving 23    tenant by the entirety;24        (2) beneficiary under a transfer on death instrument 25    executed by the deceased mortgagor prior to death;26        (3) person, persons, or entity that was conveyed title   HB4837- 6 -LRB104 19695 JRC 33144 b1    to the property by the deceased mortgagor prior to death;2        (4) person, persons, or entity that was conveyed title 3    to the property from the deceased mortgagor's probate 4    estate by the administrator or executor; or5        (5) trust that was conveyed title to the property by:6            (A) the deceased mortgagor prior to death; or7            (B) any other person, persons, or entity that is 8        identified in this subsection (h) as being exempt from 9        the requirement to appoint a special representative. 10    In no event may a deficiency judgment be sought or entered 11in the foreclosure case pursuant to subsection (e) of Section 1215-1508 against a deceased mortgagor. 13(Source: P.A. 98-514, eff. 11-19-13; 99-24, eff. 1-1-16.)